Texas, session 892, HB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter O, Chapter 42A, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Article 42A.703 to read as follows: Art. 42A.703.  NOTICE REGARDING POTENTIAL ELIGIBILITY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION. A judge who discharges under Article 42A.701 a defendant placed on community supervision for a felony shall notify the defendant, in writing, that the defendant may be eligible to register to vote under Section 13.001, Election Code. SECTION 2.  Chapter 493, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 493.037 to read as follows: Sec. 493.037.  NOTICE REGARDING POTENTIAL ELIGIBILITY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION. (a)  In this section, "offender" means an inmate or state jail defendant. (b)  The department shall notify, in writing, an offender who completes the offender's sentence, including any period of parole or mandatory supervision, that the offender may be eligible to register to vote under Section 13.001, Election Code. SECTION 3.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a person who fully discharges a sentence, including any term of incarceration, parole, or supervision, or completes a period of probation ordered by any court on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.